Maryland, session 2025, SB0830.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Labor and Employment
9–709.
(a) (1) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section and § 9–504 of this
title, if a covered employee suffers an accidental personal injury, the covered employee,
within 60 days after the date of the accidental personal injury, shall file with the
Commission:
(i) a claim application form; and
(ii) if the covered employee was attended by a physician chosen by
the covered employee, the report of the physician.
(2) (i) A claim application form filed under paragraph (1) of this
subsection shall include an authorization by the claimant for the release, to the claimant’s
attorney, THE UNINSURED EMPLOYERS’ FUND, THE SUBSEQUENT INJURY FUND, the
claimant’s employer, and the insurer of the claimant’s employer, or an agent of the
claimant’s attorney, THE UNINSURED EMPLOYERS’ FUND, THE SUBSEQUENT INJURY
FUND, the claimant’s employer, or the insurer of the claimant’s employer, of medical AND
FINANCIAL information that [is] MAY BE relevant to:
– 1 –

Ch. 308 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
1. the member of the body that was injured, as indicated on
the claim application form; and
2. the description of how the accidental personal injury
occurred, as indicated on the claim application form.
(ii) An authorization under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph:
1. includes the release of information relating to the history,
findings, office and patient charts, files, examination and progress notes, [and] physical
evidence, AND ADDITIONAL CLAIMS FILED BY THE CLAIMANT;
2. INCLUDES THE RELEASE OF INFORMATION IN THE
CUSTODY OF THE COMMISSION;
[2.] 3. is effective for 1 year from the date the claim is filed; and
[3.] 4. does not restrict the redisclosure of medical information or
written material relating to the authorization to a medical manager, health care
professional, or certified rehabilitation practitioner.
9–710.
(b) (1) If a covered employee dies from an accidental personal injury, the
dependents of the covered employee or an individual on their behalf shall, within 18 months
after the date of death, file with the Commission:
(i) a claim application form;
(ii) proof of death;
(iii) certificates of any physician who attended the covered employee;
and
(iv) any other proof that the Commission may require by regulation.
(2) (i) A claim application form filed under paragraph (1) of this
subsection shall include an authorization by the claimant for the release, to the claimant’s
attorney, THE UNINSURED EMPLOYERS’ FUND, THE SUBSEQUENT INJURY FUND, the
covered employee’s employer, and the insurer of the covered employee’s employer, or an
agent of the claimant’s attorney, THE UNINSURED EMPLOYERS’ FUND, THE
SUBSEQUENT INJURY FUND, the covered employee’s employer, or the insurer of the
covered employee’s employer, of medical AND FINANCIAL information that [is] MAY BE
relevant to:
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 308
1. the member of the body that was injured, as indicated on
the claim application form; and
2. the description of how the accidental personal injury
occurred, as indicated on the claim application form.
(ii) An authorization under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph:
1. includes the release of information relating to the history,
findings, office and patient charts, files, examination and progress notes, [and] physical
evidence, AND ADDITIONAL CLAIMS FILED BY THE CLAIMANT;
2. INCLUDES THE RELEASE OF INFORMATION IN THE
CUSTODY OF THE COMMISSION;
[2.] 3. is effective for 1 year from the date the claim is filed; and
[3.] 4. does not restrict the redisclosure of medical information or
written material relating to the authorization to a medical manager, health care
professional, or certified rehabilitation practitioner.
9–711.
(a) (1) If a covered employee suffers a disablement or death as a result of an
occupational disease, the covered employee or the dependents of the covered employee shall
file a claim application form with the Commission within 2 years, or in the case of
pulmonary dust disease within 3 years, after the date:
(i) of disablement or death; or
(ii) when the covered employee or the dependents of the covered
employee first had actual knowledge that the disablement was caused by the employment.
(2) (i) A claim application form filed under paragraph (1) of this
subsection shall include an authorization by the claimant for the release, to the claimant’s
attorney, THE UNINSURED EMPLOYERS’ FUND, THE SUBSEQUENT INJURY FUND, the
claimant’s or covered employee’s employer, and the insurer of the claimant’s or covered
employee’s employer, or an agent of the claimant’s attorney, THE UNINSURED
EMPLOYERS’ FUND, THE SUBSEQUENT INJURY FUND, the claimant’s or covered
employee’s employer, or the insurer of the claimant’s or covered employee’s employer, of
medical AND FINANCIAL information that [is] MAY BE relevant to:
1. the member of the body that was injured, as indicated on
the claim application form; and
– 3 –

Ch. 308 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
2. the description of how the occupational disease occurred,
as indicated on the claim application form.
(ii) An authorization under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph:
1. includes the release of information relating to the history,
findings, office and patient charts, files, examination and progress notes, [and] physical
evidence, AND ADDITIONAL CLAIMS FILED BY THE CLAIMANT;
2. INCLUDES THE RELEASE OF INFORMATION IN THE
CUSTODY OF THE COMMISSION;
[2.] 3. is effective for 1 year from the date the claim is filed; and
[3.] 4. does not restrict the redisclosure of medical information or
written material relating to the authorization to a medical manager, health care
professional, or certified rehabilitation practitioner.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 4 –